Washington statutes.
RCW 10.93.140

State patrol, fish and wildlife exempted.

This chapter does not limit the scope of jurisdiction and authority of the Washington state patrol and the department of fish and wildlife as otherwise provided by law, and these agencies shall not be bound by the reporting requirements of RCW 10.93.030.

[ 2002 c 128 s 2; 1985 c 89 s 14.]